Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-414, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7-414. A. The provisions of the Oklahoma Milk and Milk


Products Act shall not be construed to:


1. Include incidental sales of ungraded raw milk directly to


consumers:


a. at the farm where the ungraded raw milk is produced,


or


b. by transport by the farmer of the ungraded raw milk


pursuant to subsection C of Section 2 of this act;

Req. No. 2398 Page 1


2. Preclude the advertising of the incidental sale of goat


milk; and


3. Preclude the advertising of the sale of ungraded raw milk;


or


4. Prohibit any farmer or producer from making cheese using


milk or cream produced on the farm of such farmer or producer.


B. For purposes of this section, incidental sales of goat milk


are those sales where the average monthly number of gallons sold


does not exceed one hundred (100) three hundred (300).


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-422 of Title 2, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any farmer selling, offering, or exposing for sale ungraded


raw milk from his or her livestock is exempt from the provisions of


the Oklahoma Milk and Milk Products Act.


B. Ungraded raw milk sold pursuant to this section shall be


produced by the livestock maintained on the premises from which the


ungraded raw milk is advertised for sale.


C. For ungraded raw milk transported off the premises from


which the ungraded raw milk is produced for sale at a farmers


market, the farm shall be registered with the Oklahoma Department of


Agriculture, Food, and Forestry.


D. Any farm selling, offering, or exposing for sale ungraded


raw milk pursuant to subsection C of this section shall notify the

Req. No. 2398 Page 2


consumer that the product is not licensed, regulated, or inspected


prior to delivery.


E. The State Board of Agriculture shall promulgate all rules


necessary for the implementation of this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2398 YG 1/15/2026 12:44:26 PM



































Req. No. 2398 Page 3